Massachusetts, session 194th, H2217.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 94C is hereby amended in Section 19B by striking Section 19B and inserting in
place thereof the following new section:-
Section 19B. (a) As used in this section and unless the context clearly requires otherwise,
“opioid antagonist” shall mean any drug approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration
as a competitive narcotic antagonist used in the reversal of overdoses caused by opioids.
(b) The department shall ensure that a statewide standing order is issued to authorize the
dispensing of all opioid antagonist in the commonwealth by any licensed pharmacist. The
statewide standing order shall include, but not be limited to, written, standardized procedures or
protocols for the dispensing of all opioid antagonist by a licensed pharmacist. Notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner, or a physician who is designated by
the commissioner and is registered to distribute or dispense a controlled substance in the course
of 3

of professional practice under section 7, shall issue a statewide standing order to be used for a
licensed pharmacist to dispense an opioid antagonist under this section.
(c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a licensed pharmacist may
dispense an opioid antagonist in accordance with the statewide standing order issued under
subsection (b). Except for an act of gross negligence or willful misconduct, a pharmacist who,
acting in good faith, dispenses an opioid antagonist shall not be subject to any criminal or civil
liability or any professional disciplinary action by the board of registration in pharmacy related
to the use or administration of an opioid antagonist.
(d) A pharmacist who dispenses an opioid antagonist shall annually report to the
department the number of opioid antagonist doses dispensed. Reports shall not identify an
individual patient, shall be confidential and shall not constitute a public record as defined in
clause Twenty-sixth of section 7 of chapter 4. The department shall publish an annual report that
includes aggregate information about the dispensing of opioid antagonists in the commonwealth.
(e) A pharmacist or designee who dispenses an opioid antagonist pursuant to this section
shall, for the purposes of health insurance billing and cost-sharing, treat the transaction as the
dispensing of a prescription to the person purchasing the opioid antagonist regardless of the
ultimate user of the opioid antagonist. Unless the person purchasing the opioid antagonist
requests to pay for the prescription out-of-pocket, the pharmacist or designee shall make a
reasonable effort to identify the purchaser’s insurance coverage and to submit a claim for the
opioid antagonist to the insurance carrier prior to dispensing the opioid antagonist.
(f) Except for an act of gross negligence or willful misconduct, the commissioner or a
physician who issues the statewide standing order under subsection (b) and any practitioner who,
of 3

acting in good faith, directly or through the standing order, prescribes or dispenses an opioid
antagonist shall not be subject to any criminal or civil liability or any professional disciplinary
action.
(g) A person acting in good faith may receive a prescription for an opioid antagonist,
possess an opioid antagonist and administer an opioid antagonist to an individual appearing to
experience an opioid-related overdose. A person who, acting in good faith, administers an opioid
antagonist to an individual appearing to experience an opioid-related overdose shall not, as a
result of the person's acts or omissions, be subject to any criminal or civil liability or any
professional disciplinary action. The immunity established under section 34A shall also apply to
a person administering an opioid antagonist pursuant to this section.
(h) The department, the board of registration in medicine and the board of registration in
pharmacy shall adopt regulations to implement this section.
of 3